District of Columbia statutes.
44-2111

Repealed

Intangible personal property.

Repealed.

Nov. 7, 1941, 55 Stat. 760, ch. 469, § 3
Nov. 8, 1984, 98 Stat. 3369, Pub. L. 98-621, § 10(j)
1981 Ed., § 32-611.
1973 Ed., § 32-410.
Section 11(b) of Pub. L. 98-621 makes § 10 of that act effective on October 1, 1987.